Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-601
Ground water; declaration of policy.

The Legislature finds, recognizes, and declares that the conservation of ground water and the beneficial use thereof are essential to the future well-being of this state. Complete information as to the occurrence and the use of ground water in the state is essential to the development of a sound ground water policy. The registration of all water wells in this state should be required.

Laws 1957, c. 200, § 1, p. 702;

Laws 1967, c. 281, § 1, p. 760;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 1.